California statutes. Education Code
(E) University and community college faculty, including academics with expertise in artificial intelligence and its uses in education.

(F) Representatives of private sector business or industry, with expertise in artificial intelligence and its uses in education.

(G) Pupils enrolled in public school.

(2) At least one-half of the working group shall be composed of current, credentialed public school teachers serving in elementary and secondary teaching positions with knowledge of the use of artificial intelligence in education.

(d) The working group shall do all of the following:

(1) (A) Assess the current and future state of artificial intelligence use in education, including both of the following:

(i) The current state of artificial intelligence used by local educational agencies and charter schools, including all of the following:

(I) Technologies most commonly in use.

(II) The typical cost of those technologies.

(III) The ownership structure of those technologies.

(IV) The ownership structure of pupil- and employee-created materials.

(V) The licensing agreements for those technologies.

(VI) The ability to access source code for those technologies.

(VII) The degree to which educators were involved in the decision to use artificial intelligence.

(VIII) Artificial intelligence as a topic of instruction in developing class content.

(ii) Anticipated and potential
 developments in artificial intelligence technology in education.

(B) (i) Conduct at least three public meetings to incorporate feedback from pupils, families, and relevant stakeholders into the assessment required by subparagraph (A).

(ii) Public meetings held pursuant to clause (i) may be held by teleconference, pursuant to the procedures required by Section 11123 of the Government Code, for the benefit of the public and the working group.

(2) (A) Detail current uses of artificial intelligence in education settings including through the identification of all of the following:

(i) Examples of human-centered artificial intelligence that aid, further, and improve teaching and learning, including in ways that do
 not exacerbate existing inequities, and the work of educators.

(ii) Examples of human replacement artificial intelligence that could negatively impact pupil development, jeopardize pupil data security, or risk the jobs of educators.

(iii) Examples of strategies to ensure that there are opportunities for stakeholders to offer meaningful feedback before any given form of artificial intelligence is introduced to pupils or educators.

(B) In performing the work required by this subdivision, the working group shall solicit input from educators and pupils on their experience using the technologies identified in subparagraph (A).

(3) On or before January 1, 2026, develop guidance for local educational agencies and charter schools on the safe use of artificial
 intelligence in education that addresses all of the following:

(A) Academic integrity and plagiarism.

(B) Acceptable and unacceptable uses of artificial intelligence for pupils and educators.

(C) Pupil and educator data privacy and data security.

(D) Parent and guardian access to information that pupils enter into artificial intelligence systems.

(E) Procurement of software that ensures the safety and privacy of pupils and educators, and the protection of their data.

(4) On or before July 1, 2026, develop a model policy for local educational agencies and charter schools regarding the safe and effective use of artificial
 intelligence in ways that benefit, and do not negatively impact, pupils and educators. This policy shall include all of the following topics:

(A) Academic integrity and plagiarism.

(B) Acceptable and unacceptable uses of artificial intelligence for pupils and educators.

(C) Pupil and educator data privacy and data security.

(D) Parent and guardian access to pupil information.

(E) Procurement of software that ensures the safety and privacy of pupils and educators and their data.

(F) Effective use of artificial intelligence to support, and avoid risk to, teaching and learning.

(G) Effective practices to support, and avoid risk to, educators and pupils.

(H) Strategies to ensure that artificial intelligence does not exacerbate existing inequities in the education system.

(I) Professional development strategies for educators on the use of artificial intelligence.

(5) Identify other ways in which the state can support educators in developing and sharing effective practices that minimize risk and maximize benefits to pupils and educators, including, but not limited to, establishing communities of practice on the use of artificial intelligence in education.

(6) On or before January 1, 2027, submit a report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the
 Government Code, presenting the assessment required by paragraph (1) and any findings or recommendations related to the assessment.

(e) The department shall post on its internet website the guidance developed pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) and the model policy for local educational agencies and charter schools developed pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (d).

(f) The working group shall be subject to the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(g) The working group shall be dissolved upon submission of the report required by paragraph (6) of subdivision (d) to the Legislature.

(h) This section shall remain in
 effect only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 46.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Finances [33330. - 33338.]

33330.

The department may expend the money in any appropriation, or in any special fund in the State Treasury now remaining or made available by law for the administration of the provisions of any of the statutes enumerated in this article or for the use, support, or maintenance of any board, commission, office, or officer that is abolished by the provisions of former Section 361, and whose duties, powers, and functions are, by the provisions of Section 33306, transferred to and conferred upon the Department of Education, excepting that the funds of the State Board of Education in respect to functions retained by it, including such funds as are now or may hereafter be entrusted to the State Board of Education for administration, and the funds of the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall be administered as heretofore.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33331.

The Department of Education may expend the moneys in any appropriation heretofore or hereafter made for the support of the State Board of Education.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33332.

The Director of Finance may give the Director of Education authority to accept on behalf of, and in the name of, the state such gifts, donations, bequests, and devises as may be made to the Department of Education, or to any school or other institution administered by the Director of Education or the Department of Education, which in his judgment would be of benefit to the state and, if made to a school or other institution, would be of benefit to the school or other institution. Gifts, donations, bequests, and devises may be made subject to such conditions or restrictions as the Director of Education may deem advisable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

33333.

Money received under Section 33332 may, with the approval of the Director of Finance, be deposited by the Director of Education to the credit of the department or of the school or institution designated by him or her, in accounts in banks, or credit unions, or transmitted by him or her to the State Treasurer for deposit in trust accounts. Withdrawals may be made from the bank or credit union account or trust account by the Director of Education or any employee of the Department of Education authorized by him or her to make withdrawals therefrom.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 430, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

33334.

All moneys received by or for any school under the jurisdiction of the Department of Education from any agency of the federal government, directly or indirectly, for the education of veterans, is hereby appropriated for the support of such school in addition to such other funds as may be appropriated therefor by the Legislature.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33335.

For the purposes of Government Code Section 11032, the following constitute, among other proper purposes of like or different character, state business for officers and employees of the Department of Education for which the officers and employees shall be allowed actual and necessary traveling expenses:

(a) Attending meetings of any national association or organization having as its principal purpose the study of matters relating to education or to a particular field or fields of education, or any agency of such association.

(b) Conferring with officers or employees of the United States, or appearing before committees of either house of the Congress of the United States, relative to problems relating to education in California.

(c) Conferring with officers or employees of other states engaged in the performance of similar duties.

(d) Obtaining information useful to the department in the conduct of its work. 

When traveling is outside the state, traveling and expense shall be approved by the Governor and Director of Finance as provided in Government Code Section 11032.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33337.

It is the intent of the Legislature that, for the 1989–90 fiscal year and each year thereafter, funds shall be provided to the State Department of Education through the annual Budget Act for the purposes of carrying out the duties of the department in connection with Section 33127 of, Article 2 (commencing with Section 1240) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of, Article 2 (commencing with Section 1620) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of, Article 3 (commencing with Section 14050) of Chapter 1 of Part 9 of, Article 2 (commencing with Section 35010) of Chapter 1 of Part 21 of, and Article 2 (commencing with Section 42120) of Chapter 6 of Part 24 of, the Education Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1462, Sec. 1.122.)
-------------------------------------------

33338.

(a) The department or any other state agency that administers a grant or allocation of state funds to a school district shall allow an indirect cost rate that is not less than the indirect cost rate established by the department, unless a lower rate is required by law.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Direct cost” means a cost that provides measurable, direct benefits to a particular program of an agency. Direct costs of a local educational agency include, but are not necessarily limited to, salaries and benefits of teachers and instructional aides, costs for
 purchasing textbooks and instructional supplies, and costs for providing pupils with counseling, health services, and transportation.

(2) “Indirect cost” means the agencywide, general management cost of the activities for the direction and control of the agency as a whole. Indirect costs include, but are not necessarily limited to, administrative activities necessary for the general operation of the agency, such as accounting, budgeting, payroll preparation, personnel services, purchasing, and centralized data processing.

(3) “Indirect cost rate” means the indirect cost rate established by the department for each school district.

(4) “School district” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (d) of Section
 12000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 344, Sec. 3.   (AB 1064)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Educational Programs [33350. - 33355.]

33350.

The State Department of Education shall do all of the following:

(a) Adopt rules and regulations that it deems necessary and proper to secure the establishment of courses in physical education in the elementary and secondary schools.

(b) Compile or cause to be compiled and printed a manual in physical education for distribution to teachers in the public schools of the state.

(c) Encourage school districts offering instruction in kindergarten and any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, to the extent that resources are available, to provide quality physical education that develops the knowledge, attitudes, skills, behavior, and motivation needed to be physically active and fit for life; to provide daily recess periods for elementary school pupils, featuring time for unstructured but supervised play; to provide extracurricular physical activity and fitness programs and physical activity and fitness clubs; and to encourage the use of school facilities for physical activity and fitness programs offered by the school, public park and recreation districts, or community-based organizations outside of school hours.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 459, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

33351.

The Department of Education may employ the necessary expert and clerical assistants in order to carry out the provisions of this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33352.

(a) The department shall exercise general supervision over the courses of physical education in the elementary and secondary schools of the state; advise school officials, school boards, and teachers in the development and improvement of their physical education and activity programs; and investigate the work in physical education in the public schools.

(b) The department shall ensure that the data collected through the categorical program monitoring indicates the extent to which each school within the jurisdiction of a school district or county office of education does all of the following that are applicable to the school:

(1) Provides instruction in physical
 education for a total period of time of not less than 200 minutes each 10 schooldays to pupils in grades 1 to 6, inclusive, as required pursuant to paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 51210.

(2) Provides instruction in physical education for a total period of time of not less than 400 minutes each 10 schooldays to pupils in grades 7 to 12, inclusive, as required pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 51222.

(3) Provides instruction in physical education for a total period of time of not less than 200 minutes each 10 schooldays to pupils in an elementary school maintaining grades 1 to 8, inclusive, as required pursuant to Section 51223.

(4) Conducts physical fitness testing of pupils as required pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 60800) of Part 33 of Division 4.

(5) Includes the results of physical fitness testing of pupils in the school accountability report card as required pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 33126.

(6) Offers pupils exempted from required attendance in physical education courses pursuant to paragraph (1) of either subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 51241 a variety of elective physical education courses of not less than 400 minutes every 10 schooldays.

(7) Provides a course of study in physical education to pupils in any of grades 9 to 12, inclusive, that includes a developmentally appropriate sequence of instruction, including the effects of physical activity upon dynamic health, the mechanics of body movement, aquatics, gymnastics and tumbling, individual and dual sports, rhythms and dance, team sports, and
 combatives.

(8) Provides instruction in physical education to pupils that provides equal opportunities for participation regardless of gender.

(9) Provides instruction in physical education to pupils in any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, by physical education teachers who hold appropriate teaching credentials issued by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing.

(c) The department annually shall do both of the following:

(1) Submit a report to the Governor and the Legislature that summarizes the data collected through categorical program monitoring regarding the items described in paragraphs (1) to (9), inclusive, of subdivision (b).

(2) Post a summary of the data collected through categorical
 program monitoring regarding the items described in paragraphs (1) to (9), inclusive, of subdivision (b) on the internet website of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 45.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

33353.

(a) The California Interscholastic Federation is a voluntary organization that consists of school and school-related personnel with responsibility for administering interscholastic athletic activities in secondary schools. It is the intent of the Legislature that the California Interscholastic Federation, in consultation with the department, implement the following policies:

(1) Give the governing boards of school districts specific authority to select their athletic league representatives.

(2) Require that all league, section, and state meetings affiliated with the California Interscholastic Federation be subject to the notice and
 hearing requirements of the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(3) Establish a neutral final appeals body to hear complaints related to interscholastic athletic policies.

(4) Provide information to parents and pupils regarding the state and federal complaint procedures for discrimination complaints arising out of interscholastic athletic activities.

(5) Comply with the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code), and in doing so, as a third-party recipient of pupil and school personnel information, be afforded the same public records disclosure exemptions as are afforded
 to school districts, in order to protect the confidentiality of pupil and school personnel records and information.

(b) (1) The California Interscholastic Federation shall report to the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature and the Governor on its evaluation and accountability activities undertaken pursuant to this section on or before January 1, 2023, and on or before January 1 every seven years thereafter. This report shall include, but not be limited to, the goals and objectives of the California Interscholastic Federation with regard to, and the status of, all of the following:

(A) The governing structure of the California Interscholastic Federation, and the effectiveness of that governance structure in providing leadership for
 interscholastic athletics in secondary
 schools.

(B) Methods to facilitate communication with agencies, organizations, and public entities whose functions and interests interface with the California Interscholastic Federation.

(C) The quality of coaching and officiating, including, but not limited to, professional development for coaches and athletic administrators, and parent education programs.

(D) Gender equity in interscholastic athletics, including, but not limited to, the number of male and female pupils participating in interscholastic athletics in secondary schools, and action taken by the California Interscholastic Federation in order to ensure compliance with Title IX of the federal Education Amendments of 1972 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et
 seq.).

(E) Health and safety of pupils, coaches, officials, and spectators, including, but not limited to, racial discrimination, harassment, or hazing.

(F) The economic viability of interscholastic athletics in secondary schools, including, but not limited to, the promotion and marketing of interscholastic athletics.

(G) New and continuing programs available to pupil athletes.

(H) Awareness and understanding of emerging issues related to interscholastic
 athletics in secondary schools.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that the California Interscholastic Federation accomplish all of the following:

(A) During years in which the California Interscholastic Federation is not required to submit a report to the Legislature and the Governor pursuant to paragraph (1), it shall hold a public comment period relating to that report at three regularly scheduled federation council meetings per year.

(B) Annually allow public comment on the policies and practices of the California Interscholastic Federation at a regularly scheduled federation council meeting.

(C) Require sections of the California Interscholastic Federation to
 allow public comment on the policies and practices of the California Interscholastic Federation and its sections, and the report required pursuant to paragraph (1), at each regularly scheduled section meeting.

(D) Engage in a comprehensive outreach effort to promote the public hearings described in subparagraphs (A) and (C).

(3) (A) Upon receiving a report from the California Interscholastic Federation pursuant to paragraph (1), the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature shall hold a joint hearing at which the California Interscholastic Federation shall testify and members of the public shall be encouraged to testify on information in the report, including, but not limited to, the information required in paragraph (1).

(B) During years in which the California Interscholastic Federation is not required to submit a report to the Legislature and the Governor pursuant to paragraph (1), it shall, at the request of the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature, make itself available for hearings regarding the information in paragraph (1).

(c) (1) (A) (i) On or before January 1, 2025, the department shall develop, in consultation with relevant stakeholders, a standardized incident form to track racial discrimination, harassment, or hazing
 that occurs at high school sporting games or sporting events, and annually report the information from completed incident forms as statewide totals on the department’s internet website.

(ii) The information reported by the department pursuant to clause (i) shall be provided on an aggregated basis and in a manner that does not disclose any personally identifying information.

(B) The standardized incident form shall include a category for the basis of the complaint and shall include information on how to report a hate incident or hate crime through the Civil Rights Department’s CA vs. Hate Resource Line and Network.

(2) (A) On or before April 1, 2025, a local educational agency that
 participates in the California Interscholastic Federation shall post on their internet website the standardized incident form developed by the department pursuant to paragraph (1) and shall include information on how to submit a completed incident form to the local educational agency.

(B) A local educational agency that participates in the California Interscholastic Federation shall, upon request by the department, submit information related to any completed standardized incident forms received by the local educational agency.

(C) The department may share completed incident forms it has collected from a local educational agency with the California Interscholastic Federation to assist the California Interscholastic Federation with preparation of the report required pursuant to subdivision
 (b).

(3) A completed incident form is a public record pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) and is subject to all applicable exemptions from public disclosure under that act in order to protect the confidentiality of pupil and school personnel records and information.

(d) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Hazing” means a method of initiation or preinitiation into a pupil organization or body, whether or not the organization or body is officially recognized by an educational institution, that is likely to cause serious bodily injury or personal degradation or disgrace resulting in physical or mental harm to a former, current, or prospective pupil. “Hazing” does not include athletic events or school-sanctioned events.

(2) “Local
 educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 1327)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

33353.5.

The California Interscholastic Federation shall not transact insurance as defined in Section 35 of the Insurance Code, nor shall the federation endorse any insurance programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 617, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

33353.7.

(a) No later than July 1, 2017, the California Interscholastic Federation, in consultation with the department, shall develop guidelines, procedures, and safety standards for the purpose of classifying competition cheer as an interscholastic sport that is consistent with the United States Department of Education’s Office for Civil Rights’ definition of a sport.

(b) For purposes of this section, “competition cheer” means a sport in which teams participate in direct, head-to-head competition with one another using an objective scoring system.

(c) The California Interscholastic Federation shall seek a United States Department of Education Office for Civil Rights Title IX compliance designation for
 competition cheer. Competition cheer shall not be counted toward a school’s Title IX compliance unless the United States Department of Education’s Office for Civil Rights deems competition cheer compliant with its definition of a sport.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 57.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

33354.

(a) The department shall have the following authority over interscholastic athletics:

(1) The department may state that the policies of school districts, of associations or consortia of school districts, and of the California Interscholastic Federation, concerning interscholastic athletics, are in compliance with both state and federal law.

(2) (A) If the department states that a school district, an association, consortium of school districts, or the California Interscholastic Federation is not in compliance with state or federal law, the department may require the school district, association, consortium, or the federation to adjust its policy so that it is in compliance. However, the department shall not have authority to determine the specific policy that a school district must adopt in order to comply with state and federal law.

(B) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a complainant from a public school who wishes to file a discrimination complaint pursuant to the regulations adopted for the purpose of implementing Section 261 based on interscholastic activities conducted by an association, a consortium of school districts, or by the California Interscholastic Federation, is not required to first file a discrimination complaint with a school district, but may file an initial discrimination complaint directly with the department, and the department shall have the authority to specify, with regard to a specific discrimination complaint, the administrative remedies that an association, a consortium of school districts, or the California Interscholastic Federation must provide in order to comply with state or federal law.

(3) If the department states that a school district, association, consortium, or the federation is not in compliance with state or federal law in matters relating to interscholastic activities, and the school district, association, consortium, or the federation does not change its policy in order to comply with these laws, the department may commence with appropriate legal proceedings against the California Interscholastic Federation, the school district or against school districts that are members of the California Interscholastic Federation or the association or consortium that the department states is in noncompliance. In a legal proceeding, the court shall determine the matter de novo. The department may make recommendations for appropriate remedies in these proceedings.

(b) This section does not limit the discretion of local governing boards, or voluntary associations formed or maintained pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 35179, in any policy, program, or activity that is in compliance with state and federal law.

(c) The state law with which the policies of school districts, associations, or consortia of school districts, and of the California Interscholastic Federation, concerning interscholastic athletics, are required to comply, in accordance with this section, includes, but is not limited to, any regulations issued by the state board pursuant to Section 221.1 with regard to discrimination in interscholastic athletics.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 61.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

33355.

(a) (1) On or before January 1, 2026, the department, in consultation with relevant stakeholders and experts, shall compile, and post on the department’s internet website, standardized guidelines specifying temperature thresholds or index ratings that trigger modifications to pupil physical activities during extreme weather conditions. The standardized guidelines shall consider relevant factors, including, but not limited to, pupil ages, harmful duration of exposure to extreme weather conditions, overall pupil safety, and available mitigation measures.

(2) The department, in consultation with relevant stakeholders and experts, may use existing resources or frameworks, or both, about temperature thresholds or index ratings that trigger
 modifications to pupil physical activities during extreme weather conditions to meet the requirements of paragraph (1), including, but not limited to, the State Department of Public Health’s Health Guidance for Schools on Sports and Strenuous Activities During Extreme Heat, the National Weather Service’s HeatRisk forecast tool, and the guidelines established by the California Interscholastic Federation pursuant to Section 35179.8.

(b) (1) On or before July 1, 2026, each local educational agency shall develop, adopt, and implement weather protocols for extreme weather conditions.

(2) The weather protocols shall incorporate the standardized guidelines compiled by the department pursuant to subdivision (a) and shall detail the specific measures to be taken during extreme weather conditions, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Clear criteria for determining when weather conditions are considered extreme weather conditions and warrant modification or cessation of outdoor physical activities.

(B) Procedures for monitoring weather forecasts and alerts to anticipate extreme weather conditions.

(C) Protocols for communicating with staff, pupils, and parents or guardians regarding changes to outdoor activities due to extreme weather conditions.

(D) Designation of indoor alternative activities that can be safely conducted during extreme weather conditions.

(E) Training for staff members on recognizing signs of weather-related distress in pupils and appropriate response measures.

(F) Coordination with relevant local agencies and experts to ensure timely access to weather-related information and resources.

(3) The weather protocols shall be annually reviewed, evaluated, and, if necessary, updated to incorporate best practices and address any emerging concerns or challenges, and to reflect changes in weather patterns, advances in safety practices, and feedback from stakeholders.

(c) Commencing January 1, 2026, the department shall provide technical assistance to local educational agencies in the implementation of their weather protocols.

(d) Interscholastic athletic programs administered by the California Interscholastic Federation, including their associated practices and games, shall comply with the guidelines established pursuant
 to Section 35179.8.

(e) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Extreme weather conditions” means occurrences of unusually severe weather conditions, including, but not limited to, periods of extreme heat, excessive precipitation, and floods, that may pose significant harm to pupils.

(2) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(3) “Physical activity” means physical education classes, sports, and athletic practices and games sponsored by a local educational agency, except for those relating to an interscholastic athletic program administered by the California Interscholastic Federation.

(f) The
 implementation of this section is subject to an appropriation being made for purposes of this section in the annual Budget Act or another statute.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 47.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Workshops [33360. - 33363.]

33360.

The Department of Education and a statewide association composed exclusively of school district governing boards or county boards of education, or both, acting jointly, may conduct annual workshops within this state. Such workshops shall include but are not limited to study and instruction on the subjects of school finance, the Education Code and related laws, and the ethics, duties, and responsibilities of school district governing boards and county boards of education. A reasonable fee not to exceed the estimated pro rata cost of the workshop may be charged board members and members-elect who attend.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33362.

Any member or member-elect of a school district governing board who attends and successfully completes a workshop as authorized by this article may be reimbursed for expenses as provided for in Section 35173.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33363.

Any member or member-elect of a county board of education who attends and successfully completes a workshop as authorized by this article may be reimbursed for expenses as provided for in Section 1096.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Bureau of Indian Education [33370. - 33370.]

33370.

(a) There is hereby created within the department an American Indian Education Unit, which shall provide technical support to, and proper administrative oversight of, American Indian education programs established by the state in order to ensure that American Indian pupils in California public schools are able to meet the challenging academic standards of the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6301 et seq.) and that those programs reflect the cultural and educational standards stated in Executive Order No. 13336, 69 Federal Register 25295 (May 5, 2004), relating to American Indian and Alaska Native Education.

(b) The Superintendent shall appoint an
 American Indian Education Unit Manager who shall oversee the American Indian Education Unit.

(c) The duties of the American Indian Education Unit shall include the development of clear, consistent, and effective operating policies and procedures that include measures to ensure that the learning needs of American Indian pupils are being adequately addressed.

(d) The department shall ensure that staff are properly trained in the application of the policies adopted pursuant to subdivision (c) and that the policies are consistent with the legislative intent relating to the California American Indian Education Program and with Section 11019.6 of, subdivisions (d) and (f) of Section 11340 of, and Section 11342.2 of, the Government Code.

(e) The department shall prescribe the following:

(1) The data that California American Indian education centers shall report on an annual basis in order to measure program performance.

(2) On or before January 1, 2011, and again on or before January 1, 2016, the department shall conduct an evaluation of the centers to determine whether to renew the application of each existing center or instead to approve an application to establish a new center.

(3) A description of the consequences for failing to submit the data.

(f) The department shall adopt policies that include:

(1) An
 equitable process that will be used to select centers that will receive grant awards and determine their respective funding amounts.

(2) Establish a prompt timeframe for disbursing approved payments to the centers.

(3) A monitoring process and plan to ensure that fiscal and program information reported by the centers is accurate and complete, including a process for corrective action and investigation by the department for noncompliance. The process shall be based upon consistent and equitable principles.

(4) The incorporation of culturally responsive methodologies in order to ensure that an optimal educational program for American Indian pupils is supported and maintained.

(5) Ensuring respect for the federal trust and sovereign nation status of California American Indian tribes.

(g) The Superintendent, with input from existing California American Indian education center directors, shall appoint an American Indian Education Oversight Committee by January 30, 2007, composed of at least seven educators, four of whom shall be California American Indian education center directors. If the Superintendent is unable to find a qualified individual to fill a vacancy in one of the four positions for center directors within 30 days of the vacancy arising, he or she may fill the vacancy with an educator who is not a center director. All members shall possess proven knowledge of current educational policies relating to, and issues faced by, American Indian communities in California. This committee shall provide
 input and advice to the Superintendent on all aspects of American Indian education programs established by the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 669, Sec. 8.   (AB 1661)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. California Indian Education Centers [33380. - 33384.]

33380.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that American Indian children have not performed well in California public schools as evidenced by low academic achievement at all grade levels, high dropout rates, and by the low number of pupils achieving a higher education. It is the intent and purpose of the Legislature to establish community-based programs that promote the educational achievement of American Indian pupils attending public schools throughout the state. The department shall provide proper guidance and effective administrative support to California American Indian education centers that recognize the unique cultural and historical needs of American Indian pupils and support the need to preserve the languages, cultures, and social structures of tribal communities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 880, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)